District of Columbia statutes.
46-409

Repealed

Issuance of license — Waiting period.

Repealed.

Aug. 12, 1937, 50 Stat. 626, ch. 596, § 2
Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-148, § 2, 61 DCR 8314
Waiver of this section, see § 46-418.
This section is referenced in § 46-418.
1981 Ed., § 30-109.
1973 Ed., § 30-109.